Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2736
Scrapie control and eradication program, defined.

Scrapie control and eradication program means the cooperative state-federal-industry program administered by APHIS and consistent states to control and eradicate scrapie.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 36.